Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.302

Application question on administrative leave.

A school district employment application may not include a question asking whether the applicant has ever been placed on administrative leave.

[ 2019 c 295 s 311.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.